California statutes. Education Code
(a) By March 31, 2019, the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges shall establish an initiative to expand the use of course credit at the California Community Colleges for students with prior learning. The initiative shall identify best practices for the use of course credit for students with prior learning, locate and collect available resources, and provide professional development in connection with the identified best practices. The initiative shall identify the best practices for purposes of establishing
 potential pilot programs and shall provide recommendations for internal systemwide policy changes to expand the use of course credit at the California Community Colleges for students with prior learning.

(b) (1) By January 1, 2020, the chancellor shall submit a report to the Legislature, pursuant to Section 9795 of the Government Code, on the initiative described in subdivision (a), including, but not limited to, activities established by the initiative. The report shall include recommendations for legislative policy changes necessary to implement the best practices identified by the initiative.

(2) The requirement for submitting a report imposed under paragraph (1) is inoperative on January 1, 2024, pursuant to Section 10231.5 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 530, Sec. 1.   (AB 1786)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

66025.71.

(a) (1) (A) The Office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges, in collaboration with the Academic Senate for the California Community Colleges, shall do both of the following:

(i) By September 1, 2019, develop a consistent policy to award military personnel and veterans who have an official Joint Services Transcript containing courses that have been evaluated by the American Council on Education with full descriptions and credit recommendations, course credit for California Intersegmental General Education Transfer Curriculum, California State University General Education Breadth, or local community college general education
 requirements, as appropriate for the student’s needs, in a course with subject matter similar to that of the student’s military education, training, and service.

(ii) Periodically review and adjust the policy developed pursuant to this subparagraph to align it with policies of other public postsecondary educational institutions.

(B) By December 31, 2020, each community college district shall have a policy consistent with the policy developed by the chancellor pursuant to subparagraph (A) to assess Joint Services Transcripts for awarding course credit.

(2) Each community college campus shall post on its internet website the most recent policy adopted pursuant to this subdivision.

(b) (1) (A) The Office of the Chancellor of the California State University, in collaboration with the Academic Senate of the California State University, shall, and the University of California is requested to, do both of the following:

(i) By September 1, 2022, develop a consistent policy to award military personnel and veterans who have an official Joint Services Transcript containing courses that have been evaluated by the American Council on Education with full descriptions and credit recommendations,
 course credit for the California State University or the University of California, as appropriate for the student’s needs, in a course taught on the campus where the student matriculates, with subject matter similar, or equivalent, subject to academic and faculty review, to that of the student’s military education, training, and service.

(ii) Periodically review and adjust the policy developed pursuant to this subparagraph to align it with the policies of other public postsecondary educational institutions.

(B) By December 31, 2023, each campus of the California State University shall, and the University of California is requested to, have in effect a policy consistent
 with the policy developed pursuant to subparagraph (A) to assess Joint Services Transcripts for awarding course credit.

(2) Each campus of the California State University shall, and the University of California is requested to, post on its internet website the most recent policy adopted pursuant to this subdivision.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 567, Sec. 1.   (AB 1002)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

66025.8.

(a) The California State University and each community college district shall, and the University of California is requested to, with respect to each campus in their respective jurisdictions that administers a priority enrollment system, grant priority in that system for registration for enrollment to any member or former member of the Armed Forces of the United States, and who is a resident of California, who has received an honorable discharge, a general discharge, or an other than honorable discharge, and to any member or former member of the State Guard, for any academic term attended at one of these institutions for four academic years after the member has left state or federal active duty, which the member shall use within 15 years
 of leaving state or federal active duty.

(b) A former member of the Armed Forces of the United States or the State Guard who received a dishonorable discharge or a bad conduct discharge is not eligible for priority registration for enrollment pursuant to this section.

(c) The priority registration for enrollment provided pursuant to this section shall apply to enrollment for all degree and certificate programs offered by the institution after the military or veteran status of the student has been verified by the institution the student attends.

(d) Students who receive priority registration for enrollment pursuant to this section shall comply with the requirements of subdivision (a) of Section 78212.

(e) (1) For the purposes of this section, “Armed Forces of the United States” means the Air Force, Army, Coast Guard, Marine Corps, National Guard, Naval Militia, Navy, Space Force, and the reserve components of each of those forces, including the California National Guard.

(2) As used in this section, “member or former member of the Armed Forces of the United States” includes, but is not necessarily limited to, any student who is called to active military duty compelling that student to take an academic leave of absence.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 379, Sec. 5.   (AB 1715)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

66025.81.

(a) (1) By no later than July 1, 2023, the California State University and each community college district shall, and the University of California is requested to, with respect to each campus in their respective jurisdictions that administers a priority enrollment system, grant priority in that system for registration for enrollment to a student parent.

(2) In implementing this subdivision, each campus of the California Community Colleges, the California State University,
 and the University of California is encouraged to use information from any or a combination of the following to help determine a student parent’s eligibility for the priority registration established pursuant to this subdivision:

(A) The Free Application for Federal Student Aid (FAFSA).

(B) The California Dream Act Application (CADAA).

(C) The application to receive a fee waiver pursuant to Section 76300.

(D) Any campus form or documentation that identifies student parents.

(b) For purposes of this section, “student parent” means a
 student who has a child or children under 18 years of age who will receive more than half of their support from that student.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 935, Sec. 3.   (AB 2881)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

66025.82.

(a) Commencing with the 2025–26 academic year, the California State University shall, and the University of California is requested to, with respect to each campus in their respective jurisdictions that administers a priority enrollment system, grant priority in that system for registration for enrollment to a first responder.

(b) (1) The priority registration for enrollment provided pursuant to this section shall apply to enrollment for all baccalaureate degree and certificate programs offered by the institution after the employment of the student as a first responder has been verified by the institution the student attends.

(2) A student requesting priority registration pursuant to this section shall provide the institution with documentation that shows proof of employment as a first responder upon an initial request for priority registration and annually upon the start of each subsequent academic year if priority registration is requested.

(c) For purposes of this section, “first responder” means an employee of
 the state or a local public agency who provides emergency response services, including any of the following:

(1) A peace officer.

(2) A firefighter who is a member of a fire department of cities, counties, cities and counties, districts, or other public or municipal corporations or political subdivisions, whether the members are volunteer, partly paid, or fully paid, excepting those whose principal duties are clerical, such as stenographers, telephone operators, and other workers not engaged in fire suppression or rescue operations or the protection or preservation of life or property.

(3) A paramedic.

(4) An emergency medical technician.

(5) A public safety dispatcher or public safety telecommunicator whose primary responsibility is to receive, process, transmit, or dispatch emergency and nonemergency calls for law enforcement, fire, emergency medical, and other public safety services by telephone, radio, or other communication device, and includes an individual who promotes from this position and supervises individuals who perform these functions.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 643, Sec. 1.   (AB 255)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

66025.9.

(a) The California State University and each community college district shall, and the University of California is requested to, with respect to each campus in their respective jurisdictions that administers a priority enrollment system, grant priority in that system for registration for enrollment to a foster youth, former foster youth, homeless youth, or former homeless youth.

(b) For purposes of this section:

(1) “Foster youth and former foster youth” means a person in California whose dependency was established or continued by a court of competent jurisdiction, including a tribal court, on or after the youth’s
 13th birthday and who is no older than 25 years of age at the commencement of the academic year.

(2) “Homeless youth and former homeless youth” means a student under 25 years of age, who has been verified, in the case of a former homeless youth, at any time during the 24 months immediately preceding the receipt of the youth’s application for admission by a postsecondary educational institution that is a qualifying institution pursuant to Section 69432.7, as a homeless child or youth, as defined in subsection (2) of Section 725 of the federal McKinney-Vento Homeless Assistance Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 11434a(2)), by at least one of the following:

(A) A homeless services provider, as that term is defined in paragraph (3) of subdivision (e) of Section 103577 of the Health and Safety Code.

(B) The director of a federal TRIO program or Gaining Early Awareness and Readiness for Undergraduate Programs program, or a designee of that director.

(C) A financial aid administrator for an institution of higher education.

(D) A homeless and foster student liaison designated pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 67003.5.

(E) For American Indian students, a representative of the student’s tribe or a representative of a tribal organization that is a homeless services provider.

(c) For purposes of this section, a student who is verified as a homeless youth as defined in paragraph
 (2) of subdivision (b) shall retain that status for a period of six years from the date of admission to the postsecondary educational institution.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 574, Sec. 1.   (SB 512)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

66025.91.

Each community college district, with respect to each campus in its jurisdiction that administers a priority enrollment system, shall grant priority registration for enrollment to students in the Community College Extended Opportunity Programs and Services program, pursuant to Article 8 (commencing with Section 69640) of Chapter 2 of Part 42, and disabled students, within the meaning of the federal Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990 (42 U.S.C. Sec. 12101 et seq.), who are determined to be eligible for disabled student programs and services pursuant to Chapter 14 (commencing with Section 67300) and Section 84850.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 437, Sec. 2.   (SB 906)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

66025.92.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares that the priority enrollment for registration required by this section is necessary to ensure that the flexibility related to educational opportunities that was adopted as part of the broader changes to the California Work Opportunity and Responsibility to Kids (CalWORKs) program in Chapter 47 of the Statutes of 2012 is not undermined by students who are CalWORKs recipients being unable to access necessary classes.

(b) Each community college district that administers a priority enrollment system shall grant priority in that system for registration for enrollment to any student who is a CalWORKs or Tribal TANF
 recipient.

(c) Students who receive priority registration for enrollment pursuant to this section shall comply with the requirements of subdivision (a) of Section 78212.

(d) For purposes of this section:

(1) “CalWORKs recipient” means a recipient of aid under Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 11200) of Part 3 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code or any successor program.

(2) “Tribal TANF recipient” means a recipient of aid pursuant to Section 10553.25 of the Welfare and Institutions Code or any successor provision.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 97, Sec. 1.   (SB 164)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

66025.93.

(a) Each public or private postsecondary educational institution that is located in a county that participates in the Restaurant Meals Program established pursuant to Section 2020 of Title 7 of the United States Code shall do all of the following:

(1) Apply to become an approved food vendor for the Restaurant Meals Program if the institution operates a qualifying food
 facility on campus.

(2) Annually provide all on-campus food vendors not operated by the institution with information regarding the Restaurant Meals Program and the manner in which to apply.

(3) If an on-campus food vendor or a qualifying food facility has been approved to participate in the Restaurant Meals Program, annually inform students about the program using information provided by the State Department of Social Services.

(b) This section does not require an institution to create, operate, or maintain an EBT system on behalf of on-campus food vendors.

(c) An approved
 on-campus food vendor or a qualifying food facility participating in the Restaurant Meals Program pursuant to this section, and a county in which the program is operated, shall meet the requirements of the Restaurant Meals Program. A qualifying food facility that participates in the Restaurant Meals Program pursuant to Section 18919 of the Welfare and Institutions Code shall meet all of the requirements for participation in that program.

(d) For purposes of this section:

(1) “On-campus food vendors” does not include any vendor that does not sell prepared food for onsite consumption or that sells food from a mobile food facility,
 as defined in Section 113831 of the Health and Safety Code.

(2) “Qualifying food facility” is a facility administered by a postsecondary educational institution
 that sells prepared food for onsite consumption.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 746, Sec. 1.   (AB 1894)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

66025.95.

It is the intent of the Legislature that, consistent with the requirements and intent outlined in subdivisions (b) and (c) of Section 78215, and to the extent that the institution meets the responsibilities outlined in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 78212, any student who receives priority registration for enrollment participate in the program of services outlined in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 78212.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 704, Sec. 2.   (AB 595)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

66026.

Unless otherwise specified, reports submitted to the Legislature by the University of California, the California State University, and the Office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges shall be delivered to the Senate and Assembly budget subcommittees on education, the appropriate Senate and Assembly higher education policy committees, the Legislative Analyst’s Office, the Office of the Governor, and the Department of Finance. Unless otherwise specified, these reports may be submitted in PDF format or comparable electronic format.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 349, Sec. 3.   (SB 940)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

66026.5.

(a) The Legislative Analyst’s Office shall conduct an assessment, on or before January 1, 2031, evaluating the efficacy of existing programs in nursing jointly offered between campuses of the California Community Colleges, the California State University, and
 the University of California.

(b) The results of the assessment shall be reported, in writing, to the Legislature and the Governor on or before January 1, 2031. The assessment shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(1) The total number of joint programs currently implemented, including information identifying the number of programs, applicants, admissions, enrollments, and degree recipients.

(2) The extent to which existing
 programs fulfill identified workforce shortages, including statewide supply and demand data that considers capacity at the California Community Colleges, the California State University, the University of California, and California’s independent colleges and universities.

(3) Information on the job placement of graduates.

(4) Joint nursing program costs and the funding sources that were used to finance these programs.

(5) Time-to-degree rates and completion rates for students in joint
 nursing programs.

(6) Recommendations on whether and how joint, intersegmental nursing
 programs can or should be extended and expanded.

(c) The report submitted pursuant to subdivision (b) shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(d) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2032, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 998, Sec. 19.   (AB 176)   Effective September 30, 2024.   Repealed as of January 1, 2032, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

66027.

(a) (1) The Trustees of the California State University, the Regents of the University of California, and the governing board of each community college district are requested to, in collecting data relative to gender, race, ethnicity, or other demographics, from faculty, staff, or students, allow the faculty, staff, and students to identify their sexual orientation, gender identity, and gender expression on any forms used to collect that
 demographic data, as appropriate.

(2) A governing board shall not be required to update an existing form used to collect demographic data for purposes of this subdivision, but shall provide for the identification of sexual orientation, gender identity, and gender expression on any new or updated form used for the collection of demographic data.

(b) The Regents of the University of California, the Trustees of the California State University, and the Chancellor’s Office of the California Community Colleges are requested to report aggregate information collected pursuant to subdivision (a), to the extent that individuals from whom that information is collected authorize that information to be released where other demographic data is traditionally aggregated and reported for informational purposes and is appropriate.
 Any report developed shall be transmitted to the Legislature, pursuant to Section 9795 of, and notwithstanding Section 10231.5 of, the Government Code, no later than January 1 of each year and shall be made available to the general public on the Internet Web site of each respective institution. The information reported pursuant to this subdivision shall not include any individual identifying information.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 637, Sec. 2.   (AB 620)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

66027.2.

(a) Subject to subdivision (b), on or before September 1, 2025, each campus of the California Community Colleges and each campus of the California State University shall, and each campus of the University of California is requested to, identify and apply for at least one general store or a store that sells food on campus to become an authorized retail food store under the federal Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program and, if approved, ensure the store or stores, within a reasonable time, accept the use of electronic benefits transfer cards issued pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 10065) of Part 1 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(b) If a campus does not have a general store or a store that sells food on campus, subdivision (a) does not apply.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 913, Sec. 3.   (AB 2033)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

66027.3.

(a) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Controlled substances” includes, but is not limited to, flunitrazepam, ketamine, and gamma hydroxybutyric acid, which is also known by other names, including, but not limited to, GHB, gamma hydroxyl butyrate, 4-hydroxybutyrate, 4-hydroxybutanoic acid, sodium oxybate, and sodium oxybutyrate.

(2) “Drug testing devices” means test strips, stickers, straws, and other devices designed to detect the presence of controlled substances in a drink.

(b) (1) The
 California State University and each community college district shall stock drug testing devices, available and accessible, free of cost, in the health center located on each campus.

(2) (A) Notwithstanding
 any other law, the California State University and each community college district shall not be liable in a civil action or be subject to criminal prosecution for a defective test or inaccurate test result, including, but not limited to, a false positive or false negative test result, from a drug testing device made available pursuant to this subdivision.

(B) The California State University and each community college district shall ensure that drug testing devices made available pursuant to this subdivision have not exceeded their expiration date or recommended period of use, according to the product label, product packaging, or as otherwise recommended by the manufacturer.

(c) The California State University and each community college district shall post a notice regarding the
 requirements of subdivision (b) in a prominent and conspicuous location. This location may include, but shall not be limited to, on each campus health center’s internet website or in new student orientation materials.

(d) The Regents of the University of California, independent institutions of higher education, as defined in Section 66010, and private postsecondary educational institutions, as defined in Section 94858, are encouraged to stock drug testing devices, available and accessible, free of
 cost, in the health center located on each campus.

(e) (1) If the Regents of the University of California, independent institutions of higher education, as defined in Section 66010, and private postsecondary educational institutions, as defined in Section 94858, implement subdivision (d), the campuses are further encouraged to post a notice regarding the requirements of subdivision (d) in a prominent and conspicuous location. This location may include, but shall not be limited to, on each campus health center’s internet website or in new student orientation materials.

(2) Notwithstanding any other law, if the Regents of the University of California, independent institutions of higher education, as defined in Section 66010, and private postsecondary educational institutions, as defined in Section 94858, implement subdivision (d), the campuses shall not be liable in a civil action or be subject to criminal prosecution for a defective test or inaccurate test result, including, but not limited to, a false positive or false negative test result, from a drug testing device made available pursuant to subdivision (d).

(3) If the Regents of the University of California, independent institutions of higher education, as defined in Section 66010, and private postsecondary educational institutions, as defined in Section 94858, implement subdivision (d), the campuses are further encouraged to ensure that drug
 testing devices made available pursuant to subdivision (d) have not exceeded their expiration date or recommended period of use, according to the product label, product packaging, or as otherwise recommended by the manufacturer.

(f) This section does not prevent a campus from providing more than one location where persons may access drug testing devices.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 679, Sec. 1.   (AB 1524)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

66027.4.

As a part of campus orientation, the Trustees of the California State University shall provide, and the Regents of the University of California are requested to provide, for all campuses of their respective segments, and each campus of the California Community Colleges shall provide, educational information about CalFresh (Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 18900) of Part 6 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code), the California Earned Income Tax Credit (CalEITC) (Section 17052 of the Revenue and Taxation Code), the Young Child Tax Credit (YCTC) (Section 17052.1 of the Revenue and Taxation Code), the California Special Supplemental Food Program for Women, Infants, and Children (WIC) (Article 2 (commencing with Section 123275) of Chapter 1 of
 Part 2 of Division 106 of the Health and Safety Code), and the student eligibility requirements for CalFresh, CalEITC, YCTC, and WIC to all incoming students.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 935, Sec. 4.   (AB 2881)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

66027.41.

(a) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Donate Life California” means the nonprofit organization established and designated as the California Organ and Tissue Donor Registrar pursuant to Section 7150.90 of the Health and Safety Code. 

(2) “Donate Life California Organ and Tissue Donor Registry” means the registry established pursuant to Section 7150.90 of the Health and Safety Code. 

(b) The Trustees of the California State University shall provide, and the Regents of the University of California are requested to provide, for all campuses of their respective segments, and each campus
 of the California Community Colleges shall provide, educational information about Donate Life California and the Donate Life California Organ and Tissue Donor Registry to all incoming students. 

(c) A campus may disseminate the educational information described in subdivision (b) in a manner that best fits the needs of the campus and its student population, including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(1) During the campus orientation process.

(2) Via a short message system (SMS) alert to students.

(3) In health centers.

(4) Via a webinar.

(5) Via a school newsletter.

(6) On the campus’ internet website.

(7) Via a campus event.

(8) When a student is registering for student health insurance or health or wellness plans, or providing insurance or immunization records to the campus.

(9) In health promotional programming.

(d) Donate Life California shall provide all necessary resources, written or electronic, to assist with the dissemination of educational information pursuant to subdivision (c), based on the needs of the campus.

(e) Donate Life California shall be available to confer and collaborate on an ongoing basis with all campuses.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 60, Sec. 2.   (AB 466)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

66027.5.

(a) The California Community Colleges and the California State University shall provide information about credit by examination opportunities wherever course and class information is available.

(b) The Regents of the University of California are requested to provide information about credit by examination opportunities wherever course and class information is available.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 712, Sec. 1.   (AB 1025)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

66027.6.

(a) Each campus of the California State University and the California Community Colleges shall, and each campus of the University of California is requested to, include on the internet website-based student account associated with a student’s attendance at the institution notice of the following public services and programs:

(1) The CalFresh program.

(2) Resources, as determined by the institution to be most appropriate, for county or local housing services, which may also include, if determined to be appropriate for the geographic area where the institution is located, resources for legal assistance relating to
 housing.

(3) Resources, as determined by the institution to be most appropriate, for county or local mental health services.

(4) The California Earned Income Tax Credit (CalEITC).

(5) The Young Child Tax Credit (YCTC).

(6) The California Special Supplemental Food Program for Women, Infants, and Children (WIC).

(b) Each institution shall include, immediately adjacent to the notices specified in subdivision (a), a link to the internet web page for each noticed program or resource.

(c) Each institution may use existing resources to comply with the
 requirements of subdivisions (a) and (b).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 935, Sec. 5.   (AB 2881)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

66027.7.

(a) (1) The California State University and each community college district shall stock an adequate supply of menstrual products, available and accessible, free of cost, at no fewer than one designated and accessible central location on each campus.

(2) (A) A location’s accessibility shall be determined by considering all of, but not limited to, the following factors:

(i) Hours of operation, relative to hours that students are on campus.

(ii) Proximity to high-traffic
 areas on campus.

(iii) Accessibility by students of all genders and regardless of physical ability.

(iv) Privacy, including whether accessing products would require interaction with staff or other students.

(v) Safety.

(B) Locations described in this paragraph may include student centers, libraries, wellness or health centers, pantries, and study rooms.

(b) The California State University and each community college district shall post a notice regarding the requirements of subdivision (a) in a prominent and conspicuous location in all women’s restrooms and all-gender restrooms and in at least one men’s restroom.

(c) The Regents of the University of California,
 independent institutions of higher education, as defined in Section 66010, and private postsecondary educational institutions, as defined in Section 94858, are encouraged to stock an adequate supply of menstrual products, available and accessible, free of cost, at no fewer than one designated and accessible central location on each campus.

(d) If the Regents of the University of California, independent institutions of higher education, as defined in Section 66010, and private postsecondary educational institutions, as defined in Section 94858, implement subdivision (c), the campuses are further encouraged to post a notice regarding the requirements of subdivision (c) in a prominent and conspicuous location in all women’s restrooms and all-gender restrooms and in at least one men’s restroom.

(e) This section does not prevent a campus from providing more than one location where persons may access menstrual products.

(f) For purposes of this section, “menstrual products” means menstrual pads and tampons for use in connection with the menstrual cycle.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 664, Sec. 4.   (AB 367)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

66027.8.

(a) (1) Each campus of the California State University and the California Community Colleges with a campus mental health hotline shall, and each campus of the University of California with a campus mental health hotline is requested to, have printed on either side of student identification cards the telephone number of the campus mental health hotline.

(2) Each campus of the California State University and the California Community Colleges without a campus mental health line shall, and each campus of the
 University of California without a campus mental health hotline is requested to, have printed on either side of student identification cards the telephone number of their city’s or county’s mental health hotline.

(b) Subdivision (a) applies to a student identification card issued for the first time to a student, and to a student identification card issued to replace a damaged or lost student identification card, anytime on or after January 1, 2023.

(c) Each campus of the California State University, the California Community Colleges, and the University of California without a campus mental health hotline may establish a campus mental health hotline for students to access mental health services remotely.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 183, Sec. 1.   (AB 2122)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

66027.81.

Each campus of the California State University and the California Community Colleges shall, and each campus of the University of California is requested to, do all of the following:

(a) By no later than February 1, 2023, host on its internet website a student parent internet web page that is clearly visible and easily accessible from a drop-down menu on the internet home page of the campus’s internet website and include the information described in subdivision (b) conspicuously on both the internet website of the campus via the student parent internet web page, and on the internet website-based student account associated with a student’s attendance at the institution.

(b) (1) The student parent internet web page shall contain information that clearly lists all on- and off-campus student parent services and resources that includes, but is not limited to, all of the following:

(A) The description of the service or resource.

(B) The location where the service or resource is provided.

(C) The point of contact for the service or resource, including a name, telephone number, and email address.

(D) Any eligibility restrictions on accessing the service or resource.

(2) Of the services and resources
 provided on the student parent internet web page pursuant to paragraph (1), the student parent internet web page shall include, but is not limited to, information on the following on- and off-campus student parent services and resources:

(A) Priority registration for a student parent established pursuant to Section 66025.81.

(B) The CalFresh Program.

(C) (i) Federal and state tax credits, including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(I) The federal Earned Income Tax Credit.

(II) The California Earned Income Tax Credit.

(III) The Child Tax Credit.

(IV) The Young Child Tax Credit.

(V) The Foster Youth Tax Credit.

(VI) The federal Child and Dependent Care Tax Credit.

(VII) The federal American Opportunity Tax Credit.

(VIII) The federal Lifetime Learning Credit.

(ii) Free tax filing services offered online through Volunteer Income Tax Assistance programs.

(D) State and federal financial aid applications and programs, including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(i) The Free Application for Federal Student Aid.

(ii) The California Dream Act application.

(iii) Awards for students with dependent children established pursuant to Article 9 (commencing with Section 69465) of Chapter 1.7 of Part 42.

(iv) Any other federal or state financial aid application or program available for students with dependent children.

(E) The California Special Supplemental Food Program for Women, Infants, and Children.

(F) The California Work Opportunity and Responsibility to Kids program.

(G) Cost of attendance adjustment information, including the dependent care allowance.

(H) Resources, as determined by the institution to be most appropriate, for campus or local childcare providers.

(I) Any other financial support or income available for student parents.

(c) Provide the student parent internet web page link to students as a part of campus orientations.

(d) Provide to faculty the student parent internet web page link and encourage faculty to include the student parent internet web page link in their syllabi.

(e) To
 ensure that the student parent internet web page remains useful to student parents, the student parent internet web page shall be reviewed and updated no later than the first day of every fall and spring semester or no later than the first day of every fall and spring quarter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 962, Sec. 2.   (AB 2458)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

66027.82.

(a) For purposes of this section, “student parent” has the same meaning as defined in Section 66025.81.

(b) On or before July 31, 2025, the office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges and the office of the Chancellor of the California State University shall, and the office of the President of the University of California is requested to, develop and disseminate a policy to estimate and adjust cost of attendance information for student parents. The policy shall include student parent cost of attendance policy guidance that includes, but is not limited to, both of the following:

(1) A financial aid methodology to calculate and update a student parent’s cost of attendance that includes the actual expected costs of food, housing, transportation, and dependent childcare. This methodology shall be based on available annual cost of attendance information that includes, but is not limited to, all of the following:

(A) Food plans developed by the United States Department of Agriculture.

(B) The State Department of Social Services’ reimbursement ceilings for subsidized childcare, disaggregated by county, age, and types of care.

(C) The actual cost of on-campus family housing, the cost of a student parent’s off-campus housing, and, if a student